apertium-olo-fin.olo.twol
!! ================================================================ !
!! The Livvi (Olonets) Karelian morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! ================================================================ !


Alphabet
a b č d e f g h i j k l m n o p r s š t u v z ž ü ä ö
A B Č D E F G H I J K L M N O P R S Š T U V Z Ž Ü Ä Ö
y
Y
! MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE 02BC
ʼ

! Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä"
!A1:a
A1:ä
!A1:0

! Vowel harmony with "loi/löi" also kalatOÖ1in
!O1:o
O1:ö

! Vowel harmony with "ttu/tty"
!U1:u
U1:y

! in verb type V_AVATA
!A2:a
A2:ä
!A2:o
!A2:ö

! this appears in the illative
V1:a
V1:e
V1:i
V1:o
V1:u
V1:y
V1:ä
V1:ö

! These appear with the inessive and adessive
V2:a
V2:e
V2:i
V2:o
V2:u
V2:y
V2:ä
V2:ö

! These reduplicate the preceding vowel if it in turn is preceded by a consonant
V3:a
V3:e
V3:i
V3:o
V3:u
V3:y
V3:ä
V3:ö
V3:0

! syllable boundary for V_AVATA
%^SyllBound:0

! Used with ks:s, ps:s
%^KS2S:0

! no change
%^NONE:0 ! This will break vowel change, e.g. sa%^NONEamelaine

! this k is not effected by gradation
K1:k
%^NoGrad:0 ! This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation

! this weakens the stem _ompel_ to _ommel_
%^WGStem:0

! The ti => zi
%^T2Z:0

! the a => o
%^A2O:0

! the a => u, ä => y
%^A2U:0

! Vowel raising
%^RVws:0

%- !Hyphen in  constructions 
%>:0
#:0   ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds


%^LVws:0
%^LCns:0
%^WCns:0
%^AtoO:0
%^ÄtoÖ:0
%^OddSyll:0
%^StretchSyll2:0
%^SyllBr:0
%^E1:0


%^WEAK:0

;


Sets

VwsBack = a o u A O U ;
VwsFront = ä ö y ü Ä Ö Y Ü ;
VwsNeutral = e i E I ; 
VwsNonHigh = a o ä ö e A O Ä Ö E ;
Vws = a o u ä ö y ü e i 
      A O U Ä Ö Y Ü E I ;

Cns = b c č d f g h j k l m n p r s ş š t v z ƶ ž 
      B C Č D F G H J K L M N P R S Ş Š T V Z Ƶ Ž ʼ ;

Letters = Vws Cns ;


Definitions

! Front Trigger
FT =  [ #: Cns* [ VwsFront | VwsNeutral | i: ] | :VwsFront ] [ %> | VwsFront: | Cns | A1: | O1: | U1: ]*  ;


! Back Trigger 
BT =    #: Cns* ( [ VwsNeutral | i: ] [ %> | %^WEAK:0 | %^E1:0 | %^SyllBound:0 | %^KS2S:0 | VwsBack: | :VwsBack | Cns: | :Cns ]* )  [ VwsBack: | :VwsBack ]  [ %> | %^WEAK:0  | %^KS2S:0 | %^E1:0 | %^SyllBound:0 | VwsNeutral | i: | VwsBack: | :VwsBack | Cns: | :Cns ]* ;

! Gradation strong to weak
!GS2W = [ p:v | m p:m | t:0 | l t:l | r t:r | n t:n | s t:s | k:0 | l k:0 | r k:0 | n k:g | s k:0 ] ;

! Short vowel
SV = [ [ #: | Cns+ ] :Vws ] ;

 ! If a vowel is preceeded by this, is can be long
!  in both the inessive and the adessive
! Inessive lengthening of vowel
IL = [ #: Cns* Vws : Cns:+ | Cns* Vws+ Cns:+  Vws:+ Cns:+  ] ;

!! Right context for gradation
GRC =  [ [ ( %>: ) A1: | O1: | U1: | Vws: | :Vws ] ( %>:  i )  |  %>:  i ] %^WEAK:0  ;

! oma:ommaa, 
! Subsequent Long Vowel
! preceeded by "Cns _"
! 2012-10-11 SLV =  [ :Vws [ ( %>: %^LCns:0 %^LVws:0 | %>: %^LCns:0 | %>: i %>: | %>: ) [ V1:Vws | A1: ] |  0:Vws %>: ( %^LCns:0 | %^WEAK: ) %^LVws: | %>: %^LCns:0  ] ] ;

Rules
! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
"A1:a"
 A1:a <=> BT %> ( d: | j | t ) _ [ ( %^WEAK:0 ) h | i | %> n U1: | # ] ;
!    a: %> _ ;
! BT _   ( %>:  %^WEAK:0 ( %^LVws:0 ) |  %^LVws:0  |  %>:  %^LCns:0 ( %^LVws:0 ) ) [ ( %>: ) [ Cns | %^WEAK:0 %>: [ Cns ] | [[ Vws: ] - [ i | i:j ]]] | #: | A1: | %^StretchSyll2:0 | i | %>: ( %^WEAK:0 | %^LCns:0 ) [ V1: | V3: ] ]  ;

"A1:i"
A1:i <=> _ %> A1:ä ;

"A2:a"
A2:a <=> [ a: ] %> _ ( %^WEAK:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | U1: | m m O1: | t t O1: ]];



"A2:o"
A2:o <=> o: %> _ ( %^WEAK:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | U1: | m m O1: | t t O1: ]];
         [ o: | u ] %> _ # ;

!! Diphthong a+a => ua
"a:u before subsequent a"
a:u <=> Cns _ [ a | %> [ A1:a | A2:a ] ]; !!
        _ %^A2U:0 ;

!! Diphthong o+o => uo erota:eruou
"o:u before subsequent o"
o:u <=> Cns _ %> [ A2:o ] ; !!

! Word final u, y
"ä:y word final"
ä:y <=> _ %^A2U:0 ;

!2013-04-29!! Stem vowel loss before plural "i"
!2013-04-29!"StemVowLoss"
!2013-04-29! X:Y <=> X _  %>: i  %>: ;
!2013-04-29!!( %>:  %^WEAK:0 |  %>:  %^LCns:0 ) %>: [ i | i:j ] ;
!2013-04-29!          where X in (e o ö)
!2013-04-29!                Y in (0 0 0) matched ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! A loss
!2013-04-29!"StemALoss"
!2013-04-29! X:Y <=>  _   ( %>: %^LCns:0 ) %>: i: %>: ;
!2013-04-29!          where X in (a ä)
!2013-04-29!                Y in (0 0) matched ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!!€ osa%>^WCns%>i%>st
!2013-04-29!!€ os0000i0st
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!!%>%^LCnsi%>V1
!2013-04-29!! AÄ1 loss
!2013-04-29!"StemAÄLoss"
!2013-04-29! A1:0 <=> [ A1: | Cns: | :Cns ] _ ( %>: %^LCns:0 ) %>: i %>: ;
!2013-04-29!
! Vowel shortening before subsequent "i"
"a:0 in suaja:sai"
a:0 <=> a _ %> i ;

!2013-04-29!! U loss [u:0 | y:0]
!2013-04-29!"StemULoss"
!2013-04-29! X:Y <=> X _ %>:  i  %>: ;
!2013-04-29!! ( %>:  %^WEAK:0 |  %>:  %^LCns:0 ) %>: i %>: ;
!2013-04-29!         [ e | ä | a | o | ö ] _  [ t: | k: ] 0:v ;
!2013-04-29!          where X in (u y ü)
!2013-04-29!                Y in (0 0 0) matched ;
!2013-04-29!!Vws:0 %>:  %^WEAK:0 %>: i: %>: 
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!!€ maa%>i%>n
!2013-04-29!!€ ma00i0n
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! Stem vowel "i" loss before plural "i"
!2013-04-29!"i:Zero"
!2013-04-29! i:0 <=> i _ %>: i  %>: ;

! iToj between vowels
"i:j"
 i:j <=> :Vws ( %>:  %^LCns:0 ) %>: _ %>: :Vws ;
!2013-04-29!         Vws _ Cns:0 Vws: ;
!2013-04-29!!veitte%>%^WCnsttUY1%>%^LCns%>i%>AÄ1
!2013-04-29!!€ em0o0i%>%^LCnsAÄ1
!2013-04-29!!€ emmooj00a

"a:o in the plural and preterite"
a:o <=> # Cns* [ a ] Cns:+ _ %>: i ( %^WEAK:0 )  ;

! a to e in comparatives and passives
"a:e"
 a:e <=> _ %^WEAK:0 %^E1:0 ;

!pidiä
"ä:e piettih and in comparatives"
ä:e <=> i d: _ %^WEAK:0 %^E1:0 ;

"ä:0 pidiä:pidi"
ä:0 <=> _ %> i ;


! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
"O1:o"
 O1:o <=>  BT ( %> ) _ ;

! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
"U1:u"
 U1:u <=>  [ BT | :VwsBack ] ( %> ) _ ;

!2013-04-29!! Vws %>: %^LCns: V1:
!2013-04-29!! Vowel agreement in illative 
!2013-04-29!"V1:aeouüäö"
!2013-04-29! V1:Vx <=> :Vx %>: [ h | ( %^LCns: %>: ) ] _ ;
!2013-04-29!        where Vx in (a o u ä ö ü y) ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! Vowel agreement in illative e
!2013-04-29!"V1:e"
!2013-04-29! V1:e <=> [ e | i ] %>:  h  _ ;
!2013-04-29!          e ( %>: %^LCns: ) %>:  _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! Illative i with no intermittent _h_
!2013-04-29!"V1:i"
!2013-04-29! V1:i <=> i ( %>: %^LCns: ) %>: _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!!  _mato:maool_ not allowed
!2013-04-29!! Used with patsas type nominals
!2013-04-29!"V2:aeiouüäö"
!2013-04-29! V2:Vx <=>  Vx ( h ( :h ) ) %>:  ( %^LCns:0 )  _ [ V2: | ( %>: ([ %^WEAK:0 | %^LCns:0 ] ( V3: ) ) )  Cns ] ;
!2013-04-29!            Vx ( h ( :h ) ) %>:  ( %^LCns:0 | %^WEAK:0 ) V2: _ [ ( %>: )  Cns ]  ;
!2013-04-29!        where Vx in (a o u ä ö ü e i y) ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V2:Zero"
!2013-04-29! V2:0 <=> Vws %>: _ %>: i: %>: ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!!!!FROM HERE
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! Vowel lengthening for the inesive and adessive with V3
!2013-04-29!!! This deals with secondary or perhaps pertary vowel lengthening
!2013-04-29!! e.g. gen plural, ine, ade
!2013-04-29!"V3:a"
!2013-04-29! V3:a <=> :Cns :0* :a :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:e"
!2013-04-29! V3:e <=> :Cns :0* :e :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:i"
!2013-04-29! V3:i <=> :Cns :0* :i :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:o"
!2013-04-29! V3:o <=> :Cns :0* :o :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:u"
!2013-04-29! V3:u <=> :Cns :0* :u :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:ä"
!2013-04-29! V3:ä <=> :Cns :0* :ä :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:ö"
!2013-04-29! V3:ö <=> :Cns :0* :ö :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:y"
!2013-04-29! V3:y <=> :Cns :0* :y :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"V3:Zero"
!2013-04-29! V3:0 <=> :Vws :0* :Vws :0* _ ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! ! Vowel Lengthening
!2013-04-29!! mato : mattoon,
!2013-04-29! "Zero:Vx"
!2013-04-29! 0:Vx <=> ( Vws+ :Cns+ ) Vx _ %>: ( %^LCns: | %^WEAK:0 ) %^LVws: ;
!2013-04-29!          #: Cns* Vws [ Cns 0: | 0:i j ] Vx _ Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vws %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! ommeena<omena
!2013-04-29!! 
!2013-04-29!         [ #: ] Cns* Vws Cns 0: Vx _ Cns :0 Vws [ Cns | [ #: ] ] ;
!2013-04-29!       where Vx in (a o u ä ö y e) ; 
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! Secondary Consonant lengthening
!2013-04-29!! mato : mattoo, näytettävä : näytettävvää
!2013-04-29!!"even-syllable" This should be secondary
!2013-04-29!"consonant lengthening"
!2013-04-29! 0:Cx <=> 
!2013-04-29!         [ #: Cns* Vws+ Cns:+ Vws+ :0* Cns+ :Vws ( %>: %^LCns:0 ) | #: Cns*  Vws | %^OddSyll:0 ] Cx _ ( [ Vws: | :Vws ] ( :Vws ) ) %>: %^LCns:0 ; !
!2013-04-29!         #: Cns* Vws Cx _ [ Vws 0: Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vws | Vws %^SyllBr:0 e ] %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! ommeena<omena ; venät:vennäen
!2013-04-29!           where Cx in (m p t s n r l k g h) ;
!2013-04-29!!
!2013-04-29!! oja: oija
!2013-04-29!"j lengthening"
!2013-04-29!0:i <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vws _ j Vws ( 0: ) %>: %^LCns:0  ;
!2013-04-29!          [ [ :Cns | :Cns Vws:0 ] ( %>: ) | Cns: ] i _ %>: ( %^LCns: | %^WEAK:0 ) %^LVws: ;
!2013-04-29!         [ #: ] Cns* Vws Cns 0: i _ Cns :0 Vws [ Cns | [ #: ] ] ;
!2013-04-29!         #: Cns* Vws _ j [ Vws 0: Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vws | Vws %^SyllBr:0 e ] %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! ommeena<omena ; venät:vennäen, kaijaava
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!!!!TO HERE
!2013-04-29!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!2013-04-29!!! Consonant weakening !!
!2013-04-29!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!2013-04-29!! t:0, k:0 (suku:suun), p:v, ht:h, hk:h, lt:ll, rt:rr
!2013-04-29!! mb:mm, nd:nn, 
!2013-04-29!! it:ij, lk:l, rk:r, nk:ng, sk:s, tk:t, 
!2013-04-29!! kk:k, tt:t, pp:p
!2013-04-29!! ut:vv, yt:vv (uut:uuvv), uk:vv
!2013-04-29!! aika:ajan, poika:pojan, reikä:reijän, liika:liijan
!2013-04-29!! lp:lv, rp:rv
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"Ut:vv Uk:vv weakening"
!2013-04-29! Cx:Cy <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vws [ u: | y: ] _ 0:v [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!              where Cx in (k t)
!2013-04-29!                    Cy in (v v) matched ;

! vuozi:vuvven
"t:v"
t:v <=> u o: _ e %^WEAK:0 ;

"o:v Lengthening with Ut:vv weakening"
o:v <=> u _ t: e %^WEAK:0 ;
![ #: ] Cns* Vws [ u: | y: ] [ t: | k: ]  _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!         [ #: ][ Cns* Vws | Cns* Vws+ Cns:+ Vws+ :0* Cns+ :Vws ] v _  ( :Vws | A1: ) [ 0:Vws %>: %^LCns: | %>: %^LCns: :0* :Vws ] ; ! arvattava:arvattavvaa
!2013-04-29!        #: Cns* Vws v _ Vws [ Vws 0: Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vws | Vws %^SyllBr:0 e ] %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! kevät:kevväen, tavvaara
!2013-04-29!

! vuozi:vuot
"t:z"
t:z <=> _ %^T2Z:0 %> i ;

! vuozi:vuot+dU1, armas:armas+dU1
"d:t in partitive"
d:t <=> [ t | s ] ( %^KS2S:0 ) %> _ ;

!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! viis: viijes
!2013-04-29!"it:j"
!2013-04-29! t:j <=> [ i | o ] i _ [ e | o ] %^WEAK:0 %>: ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"st:ss weakening"
!2013-04-29!t:s <=> Vws+ s _ ( %^TS:0 ) GRC ;
!2013-04-29!! last-minute verbs
!2013-04-29!! "ti:si in verbs"
!2013-04-29!   [ n | l | r | Vws Vws ] _ %^TS:0 ; !  pittää: piti 
!2013-04-29!

"rd:rr weakening"
d:r <=>  Vws r %> _ GRC ;

"ld:ll weakening"
d:l <=>  Vws l %> _ GRC ;

"nd:nn weakening"
d:n <=>  Vws ( %^WEAK:0 %>: ) n %> _ GRC ;

"ln:ll in prtprc"
n:l <=> l %> _ U1: %^WEAK: h ;

!2013-04-29!!! p
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"mp:mm weakening"
!2013-04-29!p:m <=> [ :Vws ( %^WEAK:0 %>: ) | [ a: | ä: ] %^WEAK:0 %>: %^E1:0 | A1: | Vws+ :Cns+ Vws  %^SyllBr:0 e %^StretchSyll2:0 ] m _ [ GRC | A1: %^WEAK:0 %>: ( V3: ) Cns | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!        m _ Vws l %^WGStem:0 ; ! ompel- to ommel-
!2013-04-29!! [ ( %>: ) :Vws ( 0: ) %^WEAK:0 %>: | Vws:0 %>: i: %^WEAK:0 %>: | Vws:0 %>:  %^WEAK:0 %>: i: %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!!%> %^WCns %^E1: mp
!2013-04-29!!!
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!"nk:ng weakening"
!2013-04-29!k:g <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vws n _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;


! aika: ajan
"kToZero"
k:0 <=> _ s %^KS2S:0 ;
